Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 3 Local Authorization and Regulation

3-7-40.
Authority of counties or municipalities to regulate and license private clubs generally.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be so construed as to limit the licensing and regulatory authority of any municipality or county in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful.

Each municipality and county may license and regulate any bona fide private club located within the licensing and regulatory jurisdiction of the municipality or county.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1155, § 5; Code 1933, § 5A-6107, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-7-41.
Calling of special elections upon direction of governing authorities; notice; rules and regulations; timing; ballots; frequency; approval of licenses.

The governing authority of any county or municipality at its discretion may direct its election superintendent to issue the call for an election to determine if the sale of distilled spirits by private clubs, as provided in this chapter, shall be allowed. Upon such direction, the election superintendent shall call a special election at least 30 days prior to the date of the election and shall publish the notice of the call of the election in the official gazette of the county or, in the case of a municipal election, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality, once a week for two weeks preceding the election.

A county election held pursuant to this Code section shall be held according to the rules and regulations governing special elections contained in Chapter 2 of Title 21, and may be held at the time of holding any other primary or election in the county.

A municipal election held pursuant to this Code section shall be held according to the rules and regulations governing special elections contained in Chapter 2 of Title 21 and may be held at the time of holding any other primary or election in the municipality.

The returns of the election held pursuant to this Code section shall be made within three days after the election to the election superintendent who shall ascertain and declare the result after the receipt of the returns.

The ballot in the election shall have written or printed thereon:

Click to view

Those desiring to vote in favor of the sales shall vote “Yes.” Those desiring to vote against the sales shall vote “No.” If at the election a majority of the votes cast are in favor of the sales in private clubs, the sales shall be permitted in accordance with this article. If at the election a majority of the votes cast are against the sales, they shall be prohibited in the political subdivision, except as otherwise provided in this article.

No election under this Code section shall be held within two years after the date of the declaration of the result of a previous election held under this Code section.

The local governing authority must approve any license within its jurisdiction before issuance of the license.

“[
] YES Shall alcoholic beverages by the drink, for [
] NO consumption on the premises only, be al- lowed in private clubs?’’

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1155, § 6; Code 1933, § 5A-6108, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-7-42.
Calling of special elections upon presentation of petitions by voters; rules and regulations; frequency; procedure for calling and conduct of elections for purpose of nullifying previous election results; approval of licenses.

Upon the presentation of a petition to the election superintendent of a county or municipality, which petition must be signed by at least 25 percent of the registered voters of such county or municipality who were qualified to vote at the general election immediately preceding the presentation of the petition, the election superintendent shall call a special election at least 30 days prior to the date of the election and shall publish the notice of the call of the election in the official gazette of the county or, in the case of a municipal election, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality once a week for two weeks preceding the election. The purpose of the election provided for in this Code section shall be to determine if the sale of distilled spirits in private clubs, as provided by this chapter, shall be allowed.

Each election held pursuant to this Code section shall be held according to the same rules and regulations and subject to the same procedures provided for elections held pursuant to Code Section 3-7-41.

No election under this Code section shall be held within two years after the date of the declaration of the result of a previous election held under this Code section.

In any county or municipality which has at any time held an election in accordance with this Code section resulting in approval of the sale of distilled spirits in private clubs, the election superintendent of the county or municipality, upon a petition signed by at least 25 percent of the registered, qualified voters of the political subdivision concerned, shall proceed to call another election in the same manner as provided in Code Section 3-7-41 for the purpose of nullifying the result of the previous election. No election under this subsection shall be held within two years after the date of the declaration of the result of a previous election held under this Code section.

The local governing authority must approve any license within its jurisdiction before issuance of the license.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1155, § 6; Code 1933, § 5A-6109, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 57.

3-7-43.
Issuance of alcoholic beverage licenses to private clubs by governing authorities of certain counties and municipalities; privileges conferred by licenses; rules and regulations; sale by wholesalers to licensees.

As used in this Code section, the term “bona fide private club” shall be defined as provided in Code Section 3-7-1.

The governing authority of each county having a population of not less than 36,800 nor more than 36,990 according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful and the governing authority of each municipality in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful in each such county may issue, through proper resolution or ordinance, alcoholic beverage licenses to bona fide private clubs.

The licenses provided for in this Code section shall authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink for consumption only on the premises where sold.

Every such governing authority may adopt all reasonable rules and regulations governing the qualifications and criteria for the issuance of such licenses and may promulgate reasonable rules and regulations governing the conduct of any licensee provided for in this Code section, including, but not limited to, the regulation of the hours when alcoholic beverages may be served, the types of employees, and other matters which may fall within the police powers of such counties and municipalities.

Those persons who are duly licensed as wholesalers under this title shall be authorized to sell alcoholic beverages at wholesale prices to any person or persons licensed as provided in this Code section. Any person licensed under this Code section may purchase alcoholic beverages from a licensed wholesaler at wholesale prices.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-6121, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 511, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 3.